Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 6 Contribution Among Joint Tortfeasors

10-6-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Contribution Among Tortfeasors Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-1

.

10-6-2.
“Joint tortfeasors” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “joint tortfeasors” means two (2) or more persons jointly or severally liable in tort for the same injury to person or property, whether or not judgment has been recovered against all or some of them; provided, however, that a master and servant or principal and agent shall be considered a single tortfeasor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 313, § 1.

10-6-3.
Right of contribution declared.

Except as otherwise provided in §

10-6-7

, the right of contribution exists among joint tortfeasors; provided however, that when there is a disproportion of fault among joint tortfeasors, the relative degree of fault of the joint tortfeasors shall be considered in determining their pro rata shares.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-3

; P.L. 1977, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

10-6-4.
Payment as prerequisite — Limitation of actions.

Except as otherwise provided in §

10-6-7

, a joint tortfeasor is not entitled to a final money judgment for contribution until he or she has by payment discharged the common liability or has paid more than his or her pro rata share of the final money judgment. Actions for contribution shall be commenced not later than one year next after the first payment made by a joint tortfeasor which has discharged the common liability or is more than his or her pro rata share thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1635, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 52; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 29; P.L. 2021, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

10-6-5.
Separate settlement with injured person.

A joint tortfeasor who enters into a settlement with the injured person is not entitled to recover contribution from another joint tortfeasor whose liability to the injured person is not extinguished by the settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-5

.

10-6-6.
Effect of judgment against one tortfeasor.

The recovery of a judgment by the injured person against one joint tortfeasor does not discharge the other joint tortfeasors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-6

.

10-6-7.
Effect of release of one tortfeasor on liability of others.

A release by the injured person of one joint tortfeasor, whether before or after judgment, does not discharge the other tortfeasors unless the release so provides; but reduces the claim against the other tortfeasors in the amount of the consideration paid for the release.

A release by the injured person of one joint tortfeasor relieves that tortfeasor from liability to make contribution to another joint tortfeasor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-7

; P.L. 2006, ch. 213, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

10-6-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-7

; P.L. 2006, ch. 213, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 410, § 2, effective July 14, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 411, § 2, effective July 14, 2021.

10-6-9.
Right of indemnity preserved.

This chapter does not impair any right of indemnity under existing law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-9

.

10-6-10.
Uniformity of construction.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-10

.

10-6-11.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 940, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-6-11

.

10-6-12.
Court-approved settlements.

The following provisions apply solely and exclusively to judicially approved good-faith settlements of claims relating to the Feld Entertainment/Ringling Brothers Circus accident on May 4, 2014.

A release by a claimant of one joint tortfeasor, whether before or after judgment, does not discharge the other joint tortfeasors unless the release so provides, but such release shall reduce the claim against the other joint tortfeasors in the amount of the consideration paid for the release.

A release by a claimant of one joint tortfeasor relieves them from liability to make a contribution to another joint tortfeasor.

For purposes of this section, a good-faith settlement is one that does not exhibit collusion, fraud, dishonesty, or other wrongful or tortious conduct intended to prejudice the non-settling tortfeasor(s), irrespective of the settling or non-settling tortfeasors’ proportionate share of liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 24, § 1.